Maryland, session 2026, SB0757.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xlviii) Section 13–411.1(c)(2) of the Transportation Article; [or]
– 1 –

Ch. 423 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(15) Act or omission that relates to a residential building and that is
chargeable as a misdemeanor under or otherwise violates a provision of the Energy
Conservation Building Standards Act, Title 7, Subtitle 4 of the Public Utilities Article; OR
(16) FAILURE TO DISCLOSE THAT THE PRICE OF A CONSUMER GOOD
INCLUDES A TARIFF IMPOSED ON THE CONSUMER GOOD OR ON COMPONENTS OF
THE CONSUMER GOOD AND THE AMOUNT OF THE TARIFF.
Article – Economic Development
2.5–111.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “LOCAL SOURCE” MEANS A BUSINESS ENTITY THAT:
(I) IS HEADQUARTERED IN THE STATE; OR
(II) HAS A PRINCIPAL PLACE OF BUSINESS LOCATED IN THE
STATE.
(3) “PORTAL” MEANS THE MARYLAND LOCAL SOURCING PORTAL.
(4) “TARIFF–IMPACTED GOODS” MEANS COMMODITIES, SUPPLIES,
OR RAW MATERIALS IDENTIFIED BY THE SECRETARY AS SUBJECT TO FEDERAL
IMPORT DUTIES OR TRADE VOLATILITY.
(B) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP AND MAINTAIN A
SEARCHABLE ONLINE DATABASE, TO BE KNOWN AS THE MARYLAND LOCAL
SOURCING PORTAL, TO CONNECT BUSINESSES IN THE STATE WITH LOCAL SOURCES
FOR TARIFF–IMPACTED GOODS AND OTHER SUPPLIES.
(2) THE PORTAL SHALL BE SEARCHABLE BY NORTH AMERICAN
INDUSTRY CLASSIFICATION SYSTEM CODES.
(3) THE PORTAL SHALL COMPLY WITH:
(I) STATE AND FEDERAL ACCESSIBILITY STANDARDS FOR
DIGITAL CONTENT; AND
(II) THE DATA MINIMIZATION AND SECURITY STANDARDS OF
THE MARYLAND ONLINE DATA PRIVACY ACT.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 423
(C) (1) PARTICIPATION IN THE PORTAL BY A LOCAL SOURCE SHALL BE
VOLUNTARY.
(2) THE PORTAL SHALL ENABLE A LOCAL SOURCE TO LIST:
(I) THE CATEGORIES OF SUPPLIES OR INVENTORY HELD IN THE
STATE; AND
(II) A STATUS INDICATOR SIGNIFYING THAT INVENTORY IS
CURRENTLY AVAILABLE FOR PURCHASE.
(3) THE PORTAL IS NOT REQUIRED TO DISPLAY SPECIFIC
QUANTITIES OR PROPRIETARY STOCK LEVELS.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT MAY COORDINATE WITH THE STATE DEPARTMENT
OF ASSESSMENTS AND TAXATION, THE OFFICE OF THE COMPTROLLER, AND THE
DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY TO:
(1) IDENTIFY POTENTIAL LOCAL SOURCES FOR INCLUSION IN THE
PORTAL; AND
(2) LEVERAGE EXISTING DIGITAL INFRASTRUCTURE TO MINIMIZE
THE COST OF DEVELOPING AND MAINTAINING THE PORTAL.
(E) THE STATE, THE DEPARTMENT, AND THEIR EMPLOYEES SHALL BE
HELD HARMLESS FOR ANY CLAIMS, DAMAGES, OR LOSSES ARISING FROM:
(1) THE ACCURACY OR TIMELINESS OF DATA SUBMITTED BY A
VOLUNTARY PARTICIPANT; OR
(2) ANY TRANSACTION OR AGREEMENT ENTERED INTO BETWEEN
PRIVATE PARTIES USING THE PORTAL.
(F) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31 EACH YEAR, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON THE USE AND EFFECTIVENESS OF THE PORTAL.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 5 years and, at the end of September
30, 2031, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.
– 3 –

Ch. 423 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 4 –